Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska55-442
Court of Military Review; compensation.

Members of the Court of Military Review shall be paid the sum of fifty dollars per day when sitting and in addition shall be reimbursed for all expenses incurred as provided in sections 81-1174 to 81-1177 for state employees.

Laws 1969, c. 458, § 42, p. 1571;

Laws 1981, LB 204, § 98.